Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5214
Board; support
and assistance.

In order to carry out the provisions of the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act, the Department of Agriculture shall provide any and all of
the necessary support and assistance to the board.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 142.